Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-501
County board of corrections; sheriff; duty to implement sentence reductions and credits.

The county board of corrections shall be responsible for the implementation of sections 47-502 and 47-503 in the county in which it serves. In counties which do not have a county board of corrections, the county sheriff shall be responsible for the implementation of sections 47-502 and 47-503.

Laws 1982, LB 231, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1982, § 23-2810;

Laws 1983, LB 180, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 113, § 1.